Utah statutes.
17-30-17.   Leave of absence -- Sick leaves and vacations.
(1) The appointing authority, with the approval of the commission, may grant
an officer a leave of absence without pay for a period not to exceed one year.
In the event an officer on leave takes a higher position in police work which
does not come under the merit system provisions of this act, the leave may,
with the consent of the commission, be renewed. In the event an officer is
elected sheriff, or is appointed chief deputy, he shall automatically be
placed on leave for the period of time he remains sheriff or chief deputy.
Upon the termination of a leave of absence, the officer shall be returned to
his former position.
(2)  Sick leaves and vacations with pay shall be as provided by law or
ordinance.
